Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 498.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Human-constructed water conveyance infrastructure”:
(A) Means infrastructure built by a human to move water from  a source to a place of
use.
(B) Does not mean a section of a river or stream that is used to convey water  between
an upstream ditch or pipeline to a downstream ditch or pipeline inlet.
(b) “Nonlethal coexistence measure”:
(A) Means a nonlethal approach to effectively addressing  human-beaver conflict that re-
sults in the beaver remaining onsite, such as:
(i) The use of flow control devices to control water levels in beaver ponds.
(ii) The use of fencing to protect culverts.
(iii) The installation or replacement of fencing or paint-sand mixtures to protect trees.
(iv) The removal or notching of beaver dams when there is  an imminent danger of
flooding or no rise in the water level  is acceptable, with care taken to avoid stranding fish
and other aquatic species.
(v) The  use of dam anchors intended to encourage dam building upstream of an area of
potential human-beaver conflict.
(B) Does not mean:
(i) The gripping, trapping, injuring or killing of a beaver.
Enrolled House Bill 3932 (HB 3932-A) Page 1
(ii) The destruction or  removal of a beaver dam, lodge or bank den, other than as de-
scribed in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this paragraph.
(iii) The relocation of a beaver.
(iv) The installation of a beaver dam analog as a standalone feature and not  as part of
a dam anchor.
(c) “Public land”:
(A) Means land that is managed by this state or the federal  government and is open to
the public.
(B) Does not mean land owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(2) A person may not take a beaver for recreational  or commercial purposes from an
area that is classified by the Department of Environmental Quality as belonging in category
4 or category 5 in  a biennial report made pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C.
1251-1389) and approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and that is:
(a) A stream, river or watershed that flows through, is on or adjoins public land.
(b) Public land that is within 200 feet  of the ordinary high water mark of a river or
stream.
(3) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall publish a map of areas that meet the
criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section, and shall update the map every  two years
in consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an employee of a  federal or state land
management agency may take a beaver, or arrange for the taking  of a beaver, to address
damage, or an imminent threat, to:
(a) Built infrastructure, including a road or a culvert  or other human-constructed water
conveyance infrastructure, on public land; or
(b) Built infrastructure, or agricultural crops, on private land that is adjacent to  public
land.
(5) The use of a nonlethal coexistence  measure is preferable over the taking of beavers
under subsection (4) of this section, but an allowed taking under subsection (4) of this section
may include lethal removal or relocation when authorized by  the State Department of Fish
and Wildlife.
(6) The provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply:
(a) To private lands;
(b) Below the ordinary high water line of a navigable waterway when the adjoining land
is private land; or
(c) On public lands that are otherwise closed to the hunting and trapping of beaver.
(7) The provisions of this section do not supersede:
(a) The treaty, statutory, regulatory or aboriginal rights  or interests of a federally re-
cognized Indian tribe; or
(b) The ability to undertake tribal harvest  activities or cooperative management under
a cooperative management agreement between a tribe and the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife.
Enrolled House Bill 3932 (HB 3932-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3932 (HB 3932-A) Page 3